src/fst/emojis.lexc
👨‍👦‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👧‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👧‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👨‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👨‍👦‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👨‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👨‍👧‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👨‍👧‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👩‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👩‍👦‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👩‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👩‍👧‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍👩‍👧‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏿‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍❤️‍👨	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍❤️‍👩	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍❤️‍💋‍👨	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍❤️‍💋‍👩	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👦‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👧‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👧‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👩‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👩‍👦‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👩‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👩‍👧‍👦	emoji-inflections	;
👩‍👩‍👧‍👧	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏻‍🤝‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏼‍🤝‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏽‍🤝‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏾‍🤝‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👨🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍❤️‍💋‍👩🏿	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👨🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👨🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👨🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👨🏾	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👩🏻	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👩🏼	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👩🏽	emoji-inflections	;
👩🏿‍🤝‍👩🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑‍🤝‍🧑	emoji-inflections	;
🧑‍🧑‍🧒	emoji-inflections	;
🧑‍🧑‍🧒‍🧒	emoji-inflections	;
🧑‍🧒	emoji-inflections	;
🧑‍🧒‍🧒	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍❤️‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍🤝‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍🤝‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍🤝‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍🤝‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏻‍🤝‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍❤️‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍🤝‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍🤝‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍🤝‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍🤝‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏼‍🤝‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍❤️‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍🤝‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍🤝‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍🤝‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍🤝‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏽‍🤝‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍❤️‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍🤝‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍🤝‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍🤝‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍🤝‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏾‍🤝‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍💋‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍❤️‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍🤝‍🧑🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍🤝‍🧑🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍🤝‍🧑🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍🤝‍🧑🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🧑🏿‍🤝‍🧑🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏻‍🫲🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏻‍🫲🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏻‍🫲🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏻‍🫲🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏼‍🫲🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏼‍🫲🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏼‍🫲🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏼‍🫲🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏽‍🫲🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏽‍🫲🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏽‍🫲🏾	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏽‍🫲🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏾‍🫲🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏾‍🫲🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏾‍🫲🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏾‍🫲🏿	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏿‍🫲🏻	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏿‍🫲🏼	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏿‍🫲🏽	emoji-inflections	;
🫱🏿‍🫲🏾	emoji-inflections	;


🏃‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
🏃🏻‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
🏃🏼‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
🏃🏽‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
🏃🏾‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
🏃🏿‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍⚕️	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍⚖️	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍✈️	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🌾	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🍳	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🍼	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🎓	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🎤	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🎨	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🏫	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🏭	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍💻	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍💼	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🔧	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🔬	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🚀	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🚒	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🦯	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🦯‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🦼	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🦼‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🦽	emoji-inflections	;
👨‍🦽‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍⚕️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍⚖️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍✈️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🌾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🍳	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🍼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🎓	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🎤	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🎨	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🏫	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🏭	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍💻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍💼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🔧	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🔬	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🚀	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🚒	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🦯	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🦯‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🦼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🦼‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🦽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏻‍🦽‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍⚕️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍⚖️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍✈️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🌾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🍳	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🍼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🎓	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🎤	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🎨	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🏫	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🏭	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍💻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍💼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🔧	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🔬	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🚀	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🚒	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🦯	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🦯‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🦼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🦼‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🦽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏼‍🦽‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍⚕️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍⚖️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍✈️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🌾	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🍳	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🍼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🎓	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🎤	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🎨	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🏫	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🏭	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍💻	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍💼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🔧	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🔬	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🚀	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🚒	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🦯	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🦯‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🦼	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🦼‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🦽	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏽‍🦽‍➡️	emoji-inflections	;
👨🏾‍⚕️	emoji-inflections	;
